District of Columbia statutes.
2-1210.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Capital access loan” means a loan that is entitled to be secured by the Fund.

(2)

“Enrolled loan” means a capital access loan issued in accordance with:

(A)

The participation agreement; and

(B)

The program’s objectives.

(3)

“Financial institution” includes a bank, trust company, banking association, savings and loan association, mortgage company, investment bank, credit union, or nontraditional financial institution.

(4)

“Fund” means the Capital Access Fund established by § 2-1210.02.

(5)

“Loan” includes a line of credit.

(6)

“Medium-sized business” means a corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, or other legal entity that:

(A)

Is domiciled in the District of Columbia or has at least 51% of its employees located in the District of Columbia;

(B)

Is formed to make a profit; and

(C)

Employs at least 100, but fewer than 500, full-time employees.

(7)

“Nonprofit organization” means a corporation, association, or organization which is tax-exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, approved August 16, 1954 (68A Stat. 163; 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), that:

(A)

Is domiciled in the District of Columbia; or

(B)

Has at least 51% of its members located in the District of Columbia.

(8)

“Participating financial institution” means a financial institution participating in the program.

(9)

“Program” means the Capital Access Program.

(10)

“Reserve account” means an account established in a participating financial institution on approval of the bank in which money is deposited to serve as a source of additional revenue to reimburse the financial institution for losses on loans enrolled in the program.

(11)

“Small business” means a corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, or other legal entity that:

(A)

Is domiciled in the District of Columbia or has at least 51% of its employees located in the District of Columbia;

(B)

Is formed to make a profit;

(C)

Is independently owned and operated; and

(D)

Employs fewer than 100 full-time employees.

Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-322, § 2, 57 DCR 12442
Delegation of Authority to the Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities and Banking under the Capital Access Program Act of 2010, see Mayor’s Order 2011-91, May 6, 2011 ( 58 DCR 4177).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Capital Access Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-6, February 11, 2011, 58 DCR 1408).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Capital Access Program Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-598, November 17, 2010, 57 DCR 11018).